Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2109.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18.9 of the General Laws entitled "Benefit Determination and
Utilization Review Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.9-17. Utilization review decisions for the treatment of alcohol or substance use
disorder.
(a) A utilization review decision shall not retrospectively deny coverage for healthcare
service provided to a covered person, when prior approval has been obtained from the insurer or its
designee for those services, unless the approval was based upon fraudulent, materially inaccurate,
or misrepresented information submitted by the covered person, authorized person, or the provider.
(b) For health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, an insurer or
shall not require or conduct a prospective or concurrent review for a prescription medicine:
(1) That is used for the treatment of alcohol or opioid use disorder; (2) That contains
methadone, buprenorphine or naltrexone; or
(3) That was approved before January 1, 2027, by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for the management of alcohol or opioid use disorder, or the mitigation of opioid
withdrawal symptoms.
SECTION 2. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Utilization reviews for Medicaid benefits.

In conducting utilization reviews for Medicaid benefits, each Medicaid managed care
organization shall use the medical necessity criteria selected by the executive office of health and
human services for making determinations of medical necessity and clinical appropriateness
pursuant to the utilization review plan.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003217
========
LC003217 - Page 2 of 3